Washington statutes.
RCW 43.92.010

State geologist.

There shall be a geological survey of the state that shall be under the direction of the commissioner of public lands who shall have general charge of the survey, and shall appoint as supervisor of the survey a geologist of established reputation, to be known as the state geologist.

[ 2006 c 340 s 2; 1988 c 127 s 28; 1965 c 8 s 43.92.010. Prior: 1901 c 165 s 1; 1890 p 647 s 1; 1890 p 249 s 1; RRS s 5993.]